Indiana, session 2026, SB170.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 36-1-12-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.86-2025,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) This section applies whenever the cost of a
public work project will be at least three hundred thousand dollars
($300,000).
(b) The board must comply with the following procedure:
(1) The board shall prepare general plans and specifications
describing the kind of public work required, but shall avoid
specifications which might unduly limit competition. If the
project involves the resurfacing (as defined by IC 8-14-2-1) of a
road, street, or bridge, the specifications must show how the
weight or volume of the materials will be accurately measured
and verified.
(2) The board shall file the plans and specifications in a place
reasonably accessible to the public, which shall be specified in the
notice required by subdivision (3).
(3) Upon the filing of the plans and specifications, the board shall
2026 IN 170—LS 6784/DI 87


publish notice in accordance with IC 5-3-1 calling for sealed
proposals for the public work needed. If the board receives
electronic bids as set forth in subsection (d), the board shall also
provide electronic access to the notice of the bid solicitation
through the computer gateway administered under
IC 4-13.1-2-2(a)(6) by the office of technology.
(4) The notice must specify the place where the plans and
specifications are on file and the date fixed for receiving bids.
(5) The period of time between the date of the first publication
and the date of receiving bids shall be governed by the size of the
contemplated project in the discretion of the board. The period of
time between the date of the first publication and receiving bids
may not be more than:
(A) six (6) weeks if the estimated cost of the public works
project is less than twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000);
and
(B) ten (10) weeks if the estimated cost of the public works
project is at least twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000).
(6) The board shall require the bidder to submit a financial
statement, a statement of experience, a proposed plan or plans for
performing the public work, and the equipment that the bidder has
available for the performance of the public work. The statement
shall be submitted on forms prescribed by the state board of
accounts.
(7) The board may not require a bidder to submit a bid before the
meeting at which bids are to be received. The meeting for
receiving bids must be open to the public. All bids received shall
be opened publicly and read aloud at the time and place
designated and not before. Notwithstanding any other law, bids
may be opened after the time designated if both of the following
apply:
(A) The board makes a written determination that it is in the
best interest of the board to delay the opening.
(B) The day, time, and place of the rescheduled opening are
announced at the day, time, and place of the originally
scheduled opening.
(8) Except as provided in subsection (c), the board shall do one
(1) of the following:
(A) Award the contract for public work or improvements to the
lowest responsible and responsive bidder. or A board may
give consideration to the factors set forth in subsection (f)
in determining the lowest responsible and responsive
2026 IN 170—LS 6784/DI 87


bidder.
(B) Reject all bids submitted.
(9) If the board awards the contract to a bidder other than the
lowest bidder, the board must state in the minutes or memoranda,
at the time the award is made, the factors used to determine which
bidder is the lowest responsible and responsive bidder and to
justify the award. The board shall keep a copy of the minutes or
memoranda available for public inspection.
(10) In determining whether a bidder is responsive, the board may
consider the following factors:
(A) Whether the bidder has submitted a bid or quote that
conforms in all material respects to the specifications.
(B) Whether the bidder has submitted a bid that complies
specifically with the invitation to bid and the instructions to
bidders.
(C) Whether the bidder has complied with all applicable
statutes, ordinances, resolutions, or rules pertaining to the
award of a public contract.
(11) In determining whether a bidder is a responsible bidder, the
board may consider the following factors:
(A) The ability and capacity of the bidder to perform the work.
(B) The integrity, character, and reputation of the bidder.
(C) The competence and experience of the bidder.
(12) The board shall require the bidder to submit an affidavit:
(A) that the bidder has not entered into a combination or
agreement:
(i) relative to the price to be bid by a person;
(ii) to prevent a person from bidding; or
(iii) to induce a person to refrain from bidding; and
(B) that the bidder's bid is made without reference to any other
bid.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (b)(8), a county may award sand,
gravel, asphalt paving materials, or crushed stone contracts to more
than one (1) responsible and responsive bidder if the specifications
allow for bids to be based upon service to specific geographic areas and
the contracts are awarded by geographic area. The geographic areas do
not need to be described in the specifications.
(d) Notwithstanding subsection (b), a board may receive electronic
bids for the public work if:
(1) the solicitation for bids indicates the procedure for
transmitting the electronic bid to the board; and
(2) the board receives the bid on a facsimile machine or system
2026 IN 170—LS 6784/DI 87


with a security feature that protects the content of an electronic
bid with the same degree of protection as the content of a bid that
is not transmitted by a facsimile machine.
(e) A board may select a vendor to provide an electronic platform
to accommodate the electronic bidding process.
(f) This subsection only applies to a bidder that a board
determines to be responsible and responsive. As used in this
subsection, "Indiana resident" means an individual whose primary
residence is located within Indiana for at least twelve (12)
consecutive months before the commencement of project work. In
determining the lowest responsible and responsive bidder under
subsection (b)(8), the board may give additional consideration to
a bidder that meets all of the following requirements:
(1) The bid submitted by the bidder is not more than five
percent (5%) greater than the lowest bid submitted by a
bidder that the board determines to be responsible and
responsive, but does not meet the additional requirements set
forth in this subsection.
(2) The board determines that awarding the contract to the
bidder is in the best interest of the project and the community.
(3) The bidder commits to employing Indiana residents for at
least sixty percent (60%) of the total workforce on the project.
(4) The bidder demonstrates all of the following:
(A) Participation in a registered apprenticeship program
recognized by the United States Department of Labor that
is applicable to the work being performed.
(B) Use of a workforce whose:
(i) work eligibility status has been verified in accordance
with IC 22-5-1.7; and
(ii) E-Verify case verification numbers have been
provided to the project owner.
(C) Maintenance of a policy prohibiting the use of
independent contractors on the project, ensuring all
workers are:
(i) properly classified as employees; and
(ii) covered by appropriate insurance and tax
withholdings.
(D) Submission of certified payroll reports to the project
owner verifying compliance with all applicable wage and
labor standards.
2026 IN 170—LS 6784/DI 87